Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 350.285 is amended to read:
350.285. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means a child, adopted child or stepchild of either a service member  or a Purple
Heart recipient.
(b) “Eligible post-secondary institution” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002; and
(B) The Oregon Health and Science University.
(c) “Purple Heart recipient” means a person, alive or deceased, who:
(A) Was relieved or discharged from service in  the Armed Forces of the United States with ei-
ther an honorable discharge or a general discharge under honorable conditions; and
(B) Was awarded the Purple Heart in 2001 or thereafter for wounds received in combat.
(d) “Qualified student” means a child, a spouse or an  unremarried surviving spouse of a service
member or a child of a Purple Heart recipient.
(e) “Service member” means a person who:
(A) As a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, died on active duty;
(B) As a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, died  as a result of a military service
connected disability; or
(C) Is 100 percent  disabled as the result of a military service connected disability, as certified
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any branch  of the Armed Forces of the
United States.
(2) Subject to subsections  (3) to (7) of this section, an eligible post-secondary institution shall
waive tuition  for a qualified student for courses that may lead to a baccalaureate degree or a
master’s degree. Notwithstanding whether a qualified student [ who] received  a tuition waiver for
a baccalaureate degree , the qualified student may [ also] qualify for a tuition waiver for a master’s
degree.
(3)(a) The maximum waiver granted under this section shall be as follows:
(A) For a baccalaureate degree, the total number of credit hours  that equals four years of full-
time attendance at an eligible post-secondary institution.
(B) For a  master’s degree, the total number of credit hours that equals two years of full-time
attendance at an eligible post-secondary institution.
Enrolled House Bill 3920 (HB 3920-INTRO) Page 1
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  a waiver may not exceed the total number
of credit hours the  qualified student needs to graduate with a baccalaureate degree or a master’s
degree.
(4) A waiver may be granted under  this section only for credit hours for courses that are offered
by an eligible post-secondary institution and are available for enrollment.
(5) A qualified student may receive a waiver under this section if the student:
(a) At the time of  application for a waiver, is considered a resident of this state for the purpose
of determining tuition to be paid at an eligible post-secondary institution; and
(b) Has been admitted  to an eligible post-secondary institution for a baccalaureate degree pro-
gram or has been admitted to a master’s degree program at an eligible post-secondary institution.
(6)(a) A  child who applies for a waiver under this section must be [ 23] 31 years of age or
younger at the time the child applies for a waiver.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a child  who is older than [ 23] 31 years of
age is eligible for a waiver for a master’s degree if the child:
(A) Applied for and received a waiver for a baccalaureate degree when  the child was [ 23] 31
years of age or younger; [ and] or
[(B) Applied for a  waiver for a master’s degree within 12 months of receiving a baccalaureate de-
gree.]
(B) Provides proof of eligibility for the Survivors’ and Dependents’ Educational Assist-
ance program administered by the United  States Department of Veterans Affairs under 38
U.S.C. chapter 35.
(7)(a) The amount of tuition waived under this section may  be reduced by the amount of any
federal aid scholarships or grants, awards  from the Oregon Opportunity Grant program established
under ORS  348.205, or any other aid from the eligible post-secondary institution, received by the
qualified student.
(b) The amount of tuition waived under this section may not be reduced by the amount  of any
Survivors’ and Dependents’ Educational Assistance under 38 U.S.C. chapter 35 paid to  a qualified
student.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 3920 (HB 3920-INTRO) Page 2
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3920 (HB 3920-INTRO) Page 3